Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,136
Attorney General; duties.

The Attorney General shall investigate and render a finding when a complaint alleging a violation of sections 85-9,133 to 85-9,139 is brought by any person. Any college or university found by the Attorney General to have violated or to be in violation of sections 85-9,133 to 85-9,139 shall cease such violation immediately and permanently upon being directed by the Attorney General to do so. The Attorney General shall issue such directive in writing within three days of making a finding that a violation has occurred or is occurring. The directive shall include notification that any amount withheld or obtained from any student in violation of sections 85-9,133 to 85-9,139 shall be made available to such student for use in accord with the terms of the particular aid program not more than ten days after issuance of the directive. The Attorney General shall take whatever action is necessary to enforce the directive. The duty of the Attorney General under this section is not discretionary but mandatory.

Laws 1991, LB 69, § 4.